Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
PART 6
W

ATER SYSTEM INTERCONNECTION, REDUNDANCY, AND RELIABILITY

Editor's notes.

- Ga. L. 2010, p. 204,

§

1/SB 380, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: "Section 2 of this Act shall be known and may be cited as the 'Water System Interconnection, Redundancy, and Reliability Act.'"

12-5-200. Legislative findings.

The General Assembly finds that:

Water is an essential resource, the continued provision of which is necessary for the health, safety, and welfare of the State of Georgia; and

It is in the best interests of the State of Georgia for public water systems in the Metropolitan North Georgia Water Planning District to evaluate their withdrawal, treatment, and distribution systems and to take proactive measures to reduce the risk of catastrophic interruptions of water service during emergencies.

(Code 1981, §

12-5-200

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 204, § 2/SB 380.)

12-5-201. Definitions.

As used in this part, the term:

"Authority" means the Georgia Environmental Finance Authority created by Code Section 50-23-3.

"District" means the Metropolitan North Georgia Water Planning District created by Code Section 12-5-572.

"Emergency plan" means the written emergency water supply plan developed as provided in Code Section 12-5-202.

"Essential water needs" means the minimum amount of water needed for residential and commercial means for food processing, drinking, toilet flushing, fire fighting, hospital use, and critical asset use and a portion of the system's unaccounted for water.

"Qualified system" means any public water system owned and operated by a city, county, or water authority in the district.

(Code 1981, §

12-5-201

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 204, § 2/SB 380.)

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2010, "the Georgia Environmental Finance Authority" was substituted for "the Georgia Environmental Facilities Authority" in paragraph (1).

12-5-202. District-wide emergency plan.

Subject to authorization as provided in subsection (c) of Code Section 12-5-203, not later than September 1, 2010, the authority shall issue a request for proposal for a thorough and detailed engineering study developing a district-wide emergency plan covering every qualified system. Such plan shall identify sufficient emergency water supply sources and detailed steps required to modify a qualified system's operations to accept or share water with adjacent water providers within the Metropolitan North Georgia Water Planning District during emergencies to supply essential water needs.

The emergency plan shall evaluate risks and, where feasible, plan for a district-wide interconnection reliability target for immediate implementation of approximately 35 percent of the annual average daily demand and a long-range district-wide interconnection reliability planning goal of approximately 65 percent of the annual average daily demand.

Such plan shall be based initially on the 2035 water demand forecasted by the district in 2009 and updated by a revised forecast every five years thereafter and shall include or be based upon:

An evaluation of factors affecting water system reliability, including raw and finished water storage, infrastructure conditions, equipment redundancy, and existing interconnection capability;

Detailed hydraulic studies to determine overall distribution system improvements required to meet projected demands;

A consideration of various emergency situations, including, without limitation:

The failure of the largest water treatment facility of a qualified system;

The full unavailability of major raw water sources due to federal or state government actions;

The limited or reduced availability of major raw water sources due to federal or state government actions;

The short-term catastrophic failure of a water distribution system;

The short-term contamination of a water supply system; and

The short-term contamination of a raw water source making it unsuitable for use;

provided, however, that the results of poor planning or inadequate infrastructure investments by a qualified system shall not constitute an emergency situation.

An evaluation of the feasibility and cost effectiveness of providing multidirectional flows at existing and future interconnections with a pipe diameter equal to or greater than 12 inches;

A continuously updated inventory of distribution system components, including good system maps;

Steps that need to be taken to receive water from an adjacent utility within the Metropolitan North Georgia Water Planning District or to provide water to another utility within the district, including required new infrastructure and the location of such infrastructure for both the interconnection reliability target for immediate implementation and the long-range interconnection planning goal;

Consideration of chemical compatibility, treatment requirements, water quality, operating pressure, and impact on water withdrawal permits;

A detailed estimate of the costs of implementation for both the interconnection reliability target for immediate implementation and the long-range interconnection planning goal;

A model intergovernmental agreement for sharing and pricing of water during emergency situations; and

Creative financing options for implementation of recommended interconnection projects.

Each qualified system shall coordinate with and assist the authority in the development of the emergency plan.

The authority and its consultant shall meet at least once every three months with the district water supply technical coordinating committee to review the progress of the plan. The authority and its consultants shall receive and may incorporate the comments of the committee into the plan.

(Code 1981, §

12-5-202

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 204, § 2/SB 380.)

12-5-203. Technical panel; members; preliminary scope of work statement; modifications.

There shall be a technical panel as provided in this subsection. The Governor, the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of Representatives shall each appoint one member of the technical panel, each of whom shall be the director of a public water system located within the district. The Governor, the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of Representatives or such officers' designees shall also serve on the technical panel.

The authority and the technical panel shall use the provisions of Code Section 12-5-202 as a basis fully to define the water shortage scenarios to be evaluated in the emergency plan. The authority and the technical panel shall also prepare a preliminary scope of work statement for the plan consistent with the defined scenarios and Code Section 12-5-202.

The authority shall submit by July 15, 2010, the preliminary scope of work statement to the Governor, the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of Representatives to receive authorization to issue a request for proposals based on such preliminary scope of work statement not later than September 1, 2010.

The authority shall modify the preliminary scope of work statement or the preparation of the emergency plan if specific water allocations are provided by final federal courts rulings, state compacts, or other mechanisms. The plan shall be based on such allocations.

(Code 1981, §

12-5-203

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 204, § 2/SB 380.)

12-5-204. Completion and submission of emergency plan; costs.

The authority shall ensure the completion of the emergency plan not later than September 1, 2011, and shall submit the emergency plan to the director of the Environmental Protection Division of the Department of Natural Resources, the director of the Georgia Emergency Management and Homeland Security Agency, the Governor, Lieutenant Governor, Speaker of the House of Representatives, and chairpersons of the Senate and House Committees on Natural Resources and Environment and of the Senate and House Committees on Appropriations not later than September 15, 2011.

The authority shall update the emergency plan on the same schedule as updates for the district's water supply and water conservation management plans.

The costs of producing the emergency plan shall be borne by the authority.

(Code 1981, §

12-5-204

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 204, § 2/SB 380; Ga. L. 2016, p. 91, § 2/SB 416.)

Cross references.

- Loans and grants for reservoirs,

§

50-23-28.1

.